Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-160
Wireless telecommunications service; registry for complaints regarding lack of appropriate coverage; use.

(1) The Public Service Commission shall establish and maintain a registry of locations within the State of Nebraska for complaints made to the commission regarding the lack of appropriate coverage for wireless telecommunications service.

(2) The commission may utilize the information maintained in the registry only for making any determination related to the granting of funds through any program administered by the commission to support the construction of wireless telecommunications service facilities.

(3) For purposes of this section, lack of appropriate coverage means a geographic area where a wireless device is not able to receive a signal from the wireless service provider's network whereby an individual is unable to use a wireless device.

(4) The commission shall adopt and promulgate any rules and regulations required to carry out this section.

Laws 2018, LB994, § 5.